utilities/dictionaries/ltg_LTG-Latgalian.dic
adeit/ILNiln47-
aizkrateit/ILNiln47-
aizruodeit/ILNiln47-
aizspardeit/ILNiln47-
badeit/ILNiln47-
brauceit/ILNiln47-
buorsteit/ILNiln47-
čabēt/ILNiln47-
čeikstēt/ILNiln47-
daleit/ILNiln47-
dareit/ILNiln47-
drebēt/ILNiln47-
dunēt/ILNiln47-
dzirdeit/ILNiln47-
gaļdeit/ILNiln47-
ganeit/ILNiln47-
grabēt/ILNiln47-
graizeit/ILNiln47-
gribēt/ILNiln47-
grūzeit/ILNiln47-
gulēt/ILNiln47-
guļdeit/ILNiln47-
kaiseit/ILNiln47-
klauseit/ILNiln47-
laisteit/ILNiln47-
laksteit/ILNiln47-
laupeit/ILNiln47-
lauzeit/ILNiln47-
leidzēt/ILNiln47-
luodēt/ILNiln47-
luopeit/ILNiln47-
maidzeit/ILNiln47-
maineit/ILNiln47-
maiseit/ILNiln47-
meideit/ILNiln47-
minēt/ILNiln47-
nīzēt/ILNiln47-
plateit/ILNiln47-
praseit/ILNiln47-
radeit/ILNiln47-
raksteit/ILNiln47-
redzēt/ILNiln47-
saceit/ILNiln47-
saudeit/ILNiln47-
sēdēt/ILNiln47-
siļdeit/ILNiln47-
syuteit/ILNiln47-
skaiteit/ILNiln47-
skraideit/ILNiln47-
slauceit/ILNiln47-
smaļsteit/ILNiln47-
stateit/ILNiln47-
stuovēt/ILNiln47-
suopēt/ILNiln47-
svaideit/ILNiln47-
škaļdeit/ILNiln47-
taiseit/ILNiln47-
tupēt/ILNiln47-
turēt/ILNiln47-
uordeit/ILNiln47-
vadeit/ILNiln47-
vaidēt/ILNiln47-
varēt/ILNiln47-
